Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.340

Previously incarcerated individuals—Rental policies that are not unduly burdensome encouraged.

The legislature recognizes that stable, habitable, and supportive housing is a critical factor that increases a previously incarcerated individual's access to treatment and services as well as the likelihood of success in the community. Housing authorities are therefore encouraged to formulate rental policies that are not unduly burdensome to previously incarcerated individuals attempting to reenter the community, particularly when the individual's family may already reside in government subsidized housing.

[ 2007 c 483 s 603.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2007 c 483: "The legislature finds that, in order to improve the safety of our communities, more housing needs to be made available to offenders returning to the community. The legislature intends to increase the housing available to offenders by providing that landlords who rent to offenders shall be immune from civil liability for damages that may result from the criminal conduct of the tenant." [ 2007 c 483 s 601.]

Findings—2007 c 483: See RCW 72.78.005.